tables/fa-ir-shortwriting-1393.ctb
# Cancel a marked left cell when the outer neighbors are both non-tall:
# start/space/another short cell on the left and end/space/another short cell
# on the right.
noback pass2 `[%cancelshort]%shortcells~ %cancelshort
noback pass2 `[%cancelshort]%shortcells$s %cancelshort
noback pass2 `[%cancelshort]%shortcells%shortcells %cancelshort
noback pass2 $s[%cancelshort]%shortcells~ %cancelshort
noback pass2 $s[%cancelshort]%shortcells$s %cancelshort
noback pass2 $s[%cancelshort]%shortcells%shortcells %cancelshort
noback pass2 %shortcells[%cancelshort]%shortcells~ %cancelshort
noback pass2 %shortcells[%cancelshort]%shortcells$s %cancelshort
noback pass2 %shortcells[%cancelshort]%shortcells%shortcells %cancelshort

# If literal lower punctuation is first, cancel the marked second cell.
noback pass2 `[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]~ %cancelshort
noback pass2 `[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]$s %cancelshort
noback pass2 `[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]%shortcells %cancelshort
noback pass2 $s[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]~ %cancelshort
noback pass2 $s[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]$s %cancelshort
noback pass2 $s[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]%shortcells %cancelshort
noback pass2 %shortcells[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]~ %cancelshort
noback pass2 %shortcells[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]$s %cancelshort
noback pass2 %shortcells[%plainshortcells%cancelshort]%shortcells %cancelshort

# Remove virtual dots from every contraction that remains valid.
noback pass3 %cancelshort %finishshort
